Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-2,115
Determination and authorization
of indemnification.

(MBCA
8.55) (a) A corporation may not indemnify a director under section 21-2,111
unless authorized for a specific proceeding after a determination has been
made that indemnification is permissible because the director has met the
relevant standard of conduct set forth in section 21-2,111.

(b) The determination
shall be made:

(1)
If there are two or more qualified directors, by the board of directors by
a majority vote of all the qualified directors, a majority of whom shall for
such purpose constitute a quorum, or by a majority of the members of a committee
of two or more qualified directors appointed by such a vote;

(2) By special legal
counsel:

(i)
Selected in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1) of this subsection; or

(ii) If there are fewer
than two qualified directors, selected by the board of directors, in which
selection directors who are not qualified directors may participate; or

(3) By the shareholders,
but shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who at the time
is not a qualified director may not be voted on the determination.

(c) Authorization of
indemnification shall be made in the same manner as the determination that
indemnification is permissible, except that if there are fewer than two qualified
directors, or if the determination is made by special legal counsel, authorization
of indemnification shall be made by those entitled to select special legal
counsel under subdivision (b)(2)(ii) of this section.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 115.